District of Columbia statutes.
8-1841.09

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 409, 55 DCR 9186
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 65, 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “this subchapter” for “this section.”